Illinois, session 104th, SB1849.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 8-4, 9-1.2, 10-2, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 12-3.05, 618-2, 18-4, and 19-6 as follows: 7    (720 ILCS 5/8-4)  (from Ch. 38, par. 8-4)8    Sec. 8-4. Attempt. 9    (a) Elements of the offense.10    A person commits the offense of attempt when, with intent 11to commit a specific offense, he or she does any act that 12constitutes a substantial step toward the commission of that 13offense.14    (b) Impossibility.15    It is not a defense to a charge of attempt that because of 16a misapprehension of the circumstances it would have been 17impossible for the accused to commit the offense attempted.18    (c) Sentence.19    A person convicted of attempt may be fined or imprisoned 20or both not to exceed the maximum provided for the offense 21attempted but, except for an attempt to commit the offense 22defined in Section 33A-2 of this Code: 23        (1) the sentence for attempt to commit first degree   SB1849- 2 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    murder is the sentence for a Class X felony, except that2            (A) an attempt to commit first degree murder when 3        at least one of the aggravating factors specified in 4        clauses (iii), (iv), and (v) of subsection (a)(1)(c) 5        of Section 5-8-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections is 6        present is a Class X felony for which the sentence 7        shall be a term of imprisonment of not less than 20 8        years and not more than 80 years;9            (B) an attempt to commit first degree murder while 10        armed with a firearm is a Class X felony for which up 11        to 15 years may shall be added to the term of 12        imprisonment imposed by the court if the person 13        committed the offense while personally armed with the 14        firearm and while personally displaying the firearm;15            (C) an attempt to commit first degree murder 16        during which the person personally discharged a 17        firearm is a Class X felony for which up to 20 years 18        may shall be added to the term of imprisonment imposed 19        by the court;20            (D) an attempt to commit first degree murder 21        during which the person personally discharged a 22        firearm that proximately caused great bodily harm, 23        permanent disability, permanent disfigurement, or 24        death to another person is a Class X felony for which 25        up to 25 years may or up to a term of natural life 26        shall be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by   SB1849- 3 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1        the court; and2            (E) if the defendant proves by a preponderance of 3        the evidence at sentencing that, at the time of the 4        attempted murder, he or she was acting under a sudden 5        and intense passion resulting from serious provocation 6        by the individual whom the defendant endeavored to 7        kill, or another, and, had the individual the 8        defendant endeavored to kill died, the defendant would 9        have negligently or accidentally caused that death, 10        then the sentence for the attempted murder is the 11        sentence for a Class 1 felony; 12        (2) the sentence for attempt to commit a Class X 13    felony is the sentence for a Class 1 felony;14        (3) the sentence for attempt to commit a Class 1 15    felony is the sentence for a Class 2 felony;16        (4) the sentence for attempt to commit a Class 2 17    felony is the sentence for a Class 3 felony; and18        (5) the sentence for attempt to commit any felony 19    other than those specified in items (1), (2), (3), and (4) 20    of this subsection (c) is the sentence for a Class A 21    misdemeanor.22(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.) 23    (720 ILCS 5/9-1.2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 9-1.2)24    Sec. 9-1.2. Intentional homicide of an unborn child. 25    (a) A person commits the offense of intentional homicide   SB1849- 4 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1of an unborn child if, in performing acts which cause the death 2of an unborn child, he without lawful justification:3        (1) either intended to cause the death of or do great 4    bodily harm to the pregnant individual or unborn child or 5    knew that such acts would cause death or great bodily harm 6    to the pregnant individual or unborn child; or7        (2) knew that his acts created a strong probability of 8    death or great bodily harm to the pregnant individual or 9    unborn child; and10        (3) knew that the individual was pregnant.11    (b) For purposes of this Section, (1) "unborn child" shall 12mean any individual of the human species from the implantation 13of an embryo until birth, and (2) "person" shall not include 14the pregnant woman whose unborn child is killed.15    (c) This Section shall not apply to acts which cause the 16death of an unborn child if those acts were committed during 17any abortion, as defined in Section 1-10 of the Reproductive 18Health Act, to which the pregnant individual has consented. 19This Section shall not apply to acts which were committed 20pursuant to usual and customary standards of medical practice 21during diagnostic testing or therapeutic treatment.22    (d) Penalty. The sentence for intentional homicide of an 23unborn child shall be the same as for first degree murder, 24except that:25        (1) (blank);26        (2) if the person committed the offense while   SB1849- 5 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    personally armed with a firearm, and while personally 2    displaying the firearm, up to 15 years may shall be added 3    to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;4        (3) if, during the commission of the offense, the 5    person personally discharged a firearm, up to 20 years may 6    shall be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the 7    court;8        (4) if, during the commission of the offense, the 9    person personally discharged a firearm that proximately 10    caused great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 11    disfigurement, or death to another person, up to 25 years 12    may or up to a term of natural life shall be added to the 13    term of imprisonment imposed by the court.14    (e) The provisions of this Act shall not be construed to 15prohibit the prosecution of any person under any other 16provision of law.17(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.) 18    (720 ILCS 5/10-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 10-2)19    Sec. 10-2. Aggravated kidnaping. 20    (a) A person commits the offense of aggravated kidnaping 21when he or she commits kidnapping and:22        (1) kidnaps with the intent to obtain ransom from the 23    person kidnaped or from any other person;24        (2) takes as his or her victim a child under the age of 25    13 years, or a person with a severe or profound   SB1849- 6 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    intellectual disability;2        (3) inflicts great bodily harm, other than by the 3    discharge of a firearm, or commits another felony upon his 4    or her victim;5        (4) wears a hood, robe, or mask or conceals his or her 6    identity;7        (5) commits the offense of kidnaping while armed with 8    a dangerous weapon, other than a firearm, as defined in 9    Section 33A-1 of this Code;10        (6) commits the offense of kidnaping while armed with 11    a firearm;12        (7) during the commission of the offense of kidnaping, 13    personally discharges a firearm; or14        (8) during the commission of the offense of kidnaping, 15    personally discharges a firearm that proximately causes 16    great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 17    disfigurement, or death to another person.18    As used in this Section, "ransom" includes money, benefit, 19or other valuable thing or concession.20    (b) Sentence. Aggravated kidnaping in violation of 21paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subsection (a) is a 22Class X felony. A violation of subsection (a)(6) is a Class X 23felony for which up to 15 years may shall be added to the term 24of imprisonment imposed by the court, if the person committed 25the offense while personally armed with a firearm, and while 26personally displaying the firearm. A violation of subsection   SB1849- 7 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1(a)(7) is a Class X felony for which up to 20 years may shall 2be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court. A 3violation of subsection (a)(8) is a Class X felony for which up 4to 25 years may or up to a term of natural life shall be added 5to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court. An offender 6under the age of 18 years at the time of the commission of 7aggravated kidnaping in violation of paragraphs (1) through 8(8) of subsection (a) shall be sentenced under Section 95-4.5-105 of the Unified Code of Corrections.10    A person who has attained the age of 18 years at the time 11of the commission of the offense and who is convicted of a 12second or subsequent offense of aggravated kidnaping shall be 13sentenced to a term of natural life imprisonment; except that 14a sentence of natural life imprisonment shall not be imposed 15under this Section unless the second or subsequent offense was 16committed after conviction on the first offense. An offender 17under the age of 18 years at the time of the commission of the 18second or subsequent offense shall be sentenced under Section 195-4.5-105 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 20(Source: P.A. 99-69, eff. 1-1-16; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 2199-642, eff. 7-28-16.) 22    (720 ILCS 5/11-1.30)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-14)23    Sec. 11-1.30. Aggravated Criminal Sexual Assault. 24    (a) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual assault if 25that person commits criminal sexual assault and any of the   SB1849- 8 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1following aggravating circumstances exist during the 2commission of the offense or, for purposes of paragraph (7), 3occur as part of the same course of conduct as the commission 4of the offense:5        (1) the person displays, threatens to use, or uses a 6    dangerous weapon, other than a firearm, or any other 7    object fashioned or used in a manner that leads the 8    victim, under the circumstances, reasonably to believe 9    that the object is a dangerous weapon;10        (2) the person causes bodily harm to the victim, 11    except as provided in paragraph (10);12        (3) the person acts in a manner that threatens or 13    endangers the life of the victim or any other person;14        (4) the person commits the criminal sexual assault 15    during the course of committing or attempting to commit 16    any other felony;17        (5) the victim is 60 years of age or older;18        (6) the victim is a person with a physical disability;19        (7) the person delivers (by injection, inhalation, 20    ingestion, transfer of possession, or any other means) any 21    controlled substance to the victim without the victim's 22    consent or by threat or deception for other than medical 23    purposes;24        (8) the person is armed with a firearm;25        (9) the person personally discharges a firearm during 26    the commission of the offense; or  SB1849- 9 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1        (10) the person personally discharges a firearm during 2    the commission of the offense, and that discharge 3    proximately causes great bodily harm, permanent 4    disability, permanent disfigurement, or death to another 5    person.6    (b) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual assault if 7that person is under 17 years of age and: (i) commits an act of 8sexual penetration with a victim who is under 9 years of age; 9or (ii) commits an act of sexual penetration with a victim who 10is at least 9 years of age but under 13 years of age and the 11person uses force or threat of force to commit the act.12    (c) A person commits aggravated criminal sexual assault if 13that person commits an act of sexual penetration with a victim 14who is a person with a severe or profound intellectual 15disability.16    (d) Sentence.17        (1) Aggravated criminal sexual assault in violation of 18    paragraph (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), or (7) of subsection 19    (a) or in violation of subsection (b) or (c) is a Class X 20    felony. A violation of subsection (a)(1) is a Class X 21    felony for which 10 years shall be added to the term of 22    imprisonment imposed by the court. A violation of 23    subsection (a)(8) is a Class X felony for which up to 15 24    years may shall be added to the term of imprisonment 25    imposed by the court, if the person committed the offense 26    while personally armed with a firearm, and while   SB1849- 10 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    personally displaying the firearm. A violation of 2    subsection (a)(9) is a Class X felony for which up to 20 3    years may shall be added to the term of imprisonment 4    imposed by the court. A violation of subsection (a)(10) is 5    a Class X felony for which up to 25 years may or up to a 6    term of natural life imprisonment shall be added to the 7    term of imprisonment imposed by the court. An offender 8    under the age of 18 years at the time of the commission of 9    aggravated criminal sexual assault in violation of 10    paragraphs (1) through (10) of subsection (a) shall be 11    sentenced under Section 5-4.5-105 of the Unified Code of 12    Corrections. 13        (2) A person who has attained the age of 18 years at 14    the time of the commission of the offense and who is 15    convicted of a second or subsequent offense of aggravated 16    criminal sexual assault, or who is convicted of the 17    offense of aggravated criminal sexual assault after having 18    previously been convicted of the offense of criminal 19    sexual assault or the offense of predatory criminal sexual 20    assault of a child, or who is convicted of the offense of 21    aggravated criminal sexual assault after having previously 22    been convicted under the laws of this or any other state of 23    an offense that is substantially equivalent to the offense 24    of criminal sexual assault, the offense of aggravated 25    criminal sexual assault or the offense of predatory 26    criminal sexual assault of a child, shall be sentenced to   SB1849- 11 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    a term of natural life imprisonment. The commission of the 2    second or subsequent offense is required to have been 3    after the initial conviction for this paragraph (2) to 4    apply. An offender under the age of 18 years at the time of 5    the commission of the offense covered by this paragraph 6    (2) shall be sentenced under Section 5-4.5-105 of the 7    Unified Code of Corrections. 8(Source: P.A. 99-69, eff. 1-1-16; 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 999-642, eff. 7-28-16.) 10    (720 ILCS 5/11-1.40)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-14.1)11    Sec. 11-1.40. Predatory criminal sexual assault of a 12child. 13    (a) A person commits predatory criminal sexual assault of 14a child if that person is 17 years of age or older, and commits 15an act of contact, however slight, between the sex organ or 16anus of one person and the part of the body of another for the 17purpose of sexual gratification or arousal of the victim or 18the accused, or an act of sexual penetration, and:19        (1) the victim is under 13 years of age; or20        (2) the victim is under 13 years of age and that 21    person:22            (A) is armed with a firearm;23            (B) personally discharges a firearm during the 24        commission of the offense;25            (C) causes great bodily harm to the victim that:  SB1849- 12 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1                (i) results in permanent disability; or2                (ii) is life threatening; or3            (D) delivers (by injection, inhalation, ingestion, 4        transfer of possession, or any other means) any 5        controlled substance to the victim without the 6        victim's consent or by threat or deception, for other 7        than medical purposes.8    (b) Sentence.9        (1) A person convicted of a violation of subsection 10    (a)(1) commits a Class X felony, for which the person 11    shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less 12    than 6 years and not more than 60 years. A person convicted 13    of a violation of subsection (a)(2)(A) commits a Class X 14    felony for which up to 15 years may shall be added to the 15    term of imprisonment imposed by the court, if the person 16    committed the offense while personally armed with a 17    firearm, and while personally displaying the firearm. A 18    person convicted of a violation of subsection (a)(2)(B) 19    commits a Class X felony for which up to 20 years may shall 20    be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court. 21    A person who has attained the age of 18 years at the time 22    of the commission of the offense and who is convicted of a 23    violation of subsection (a)(2)(C) commits a Class X felony 24    for which the person shall be sentenced to a term of 25    imprisonment of not less than 50 years or up to a term of 26    natural life imprisonment. An offender under the age of 18   SB1849- 13 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    years at the time of the commission of predatory criminal 2    sexual assault of a child in violation of subsections 3    (a)(1), (a)(2)(A), (a)(2)(B), and (a)(2)(C) shall be 4    sentenced under Section 5-4.5-105 of the Unified Code of 5    Corrections. 6        (1.1) A person convicted of a violation of subsection 7    (a)(2)(D) commits a Class X felony for which the person 8    shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less 9    than 50 years and not more than 60 years. An offender under 10    the age of 18 years at the time of the commission of 11    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child in violation 12    of subsection (a)(2)(D) shall be sentenced under Section 13    5-4.5-105 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 14        (1.2) A person who has attained the age of 18 years at 15    the time of the commission of the offense and convicted of 16    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child committed 17    against 2 or more persons regardless of whether the 18    offenses occurred as the result of the same act or of 19    several related or unrelated acts shall be sentenced to a 20    term of natural life imprisonment and an offender under 21    the age of 18 years at the time of the commission of the 22    offense shall be sentenced under Section 5-4.5-105 of the 23    Unified Code of Corrections.24        (2) A person who has attained the age of 18 years at 25    the time of the commission of the offense and who is 26    convicted of a second or subsequent offense of predatory   SB1849- 14 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    criminal sexual assault of a child, or who is convicted of 2    the offense of predatory criminal sexual assault of a 3    child after having previously been convicted of the 4    offense of criminal sexual assault or the offense of 5    aggravated criminal sexual assault, or who is convicted of 6    the offense of predatory criminal sexual assault of a 7    child after having previously been convicted under the 8    laws of this State or any other state of an offense that is 9    substantially equivalent to the offense of predatory 10    criminal sexual assault of a child, the offense of 11    aggravated criminal sexual assault or the offense of 12    criminal sexual assault, shall be sentenced to a term of 13    natural life imprisonment. The commission of the second or 14    subsequent offense is required to have been after the 15    initial conviction for this paragraph (2) to apply. An 16    offender under the age of 18 years at the time of the 17    commission of the offense covered by this paragraph (2) 18    shall be sentenced under Section 5-4.5-105 of the Unified 19    Code of Corrections. 20(Source: P.A. 98-370, eff. 1-1-14; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14; 2198-903, eff. 8-15-14; 99-69, eff. 1-1-16.) 22    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.05)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-4)23    Sec. 12-3.05. Aggravated battery. 24    (a) Offense based on injury. A person commits aggravated 25battery when, in committing a battery, other than by the   SB1849- 15 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1discharge of a firearm, he or she knowingly does any of the 2following:3        (1) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 4    or disfigurement.5        (2) Causes severe and permanent disability, great 6    bodily harm, or disfigurement by means of a caustic or 7    flammable substance, a poisonous gas, a deadly biological 8    or chemical contaminant or agent, a radioactive substance, 9    or a bomb or explosive compound.10        (3) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 11    or disfigurement to an individual whom the person knows to 12    be a peace officer, community policing volunteer, fireman, 13    private security officer, correctional institution 14    employee, or Department of Human Services employee 15    supervising or controlling sexually dangerous persons or 16    sexually violent persons:17            (i) performing his or her official duties;18            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 19        official duties; or20            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 21        or her official duties.22        (4) Causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 23    or disfigurement to an individual 60 years of age or 24    older.25        (5) Strangles another individual. 26    (b) Offense based on injury to a child or person with an   SB1849- 16 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1intellectual disability. A person who is at least 18 years of 2age commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, 3he or she knowingly and without legal justification by any 4means:5        (1) causes great bodily harm or permanent disability 6    or disfigurement to any child under the age of 13 years, or 7    to any person with a severe or profound intellectual 8    disability; or9        (2) causes bodily harm or disability or disfigurement 10    to any child under the age of 13 years or to any person 11    with a severe or profound intellectual disability. 12    (c) Offense based on location of conduct. A person commits 13aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 14by the discharge of a firearm, he or she is or the person 15battered is on or about a public way, public property, a public 16place of accommodation or amusement, a sports venue, or a 17domestic violence shelter, or in a church, synagogue, mosque, 18or other building, structure, or place used for religious 19worship.20    (d) Offense based on status of victim. A person commits 21aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, other than 22by discharge of a firearm, he or she knows the individual 23battered to be any of the following:24        (1) A person 60 years of age or older.25        (2) A person who is pregnant or has a physical 26    disability.  SB1849- 17 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1        (3) A teacher or school employee upon school grounds 2    or grounds adjacent to a school or in any part of a 3    building used for school purposes.4        (4) A peace officer, community policing volunteer, 5    fireman, private security officer, correctional 6    institution employee, or Department of Human Services 7    employee supervising or controlling sexually dangerous 8    persons or sexually violent persons:9            (i) performing his or her official duties;10            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 11        official duties; or12            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 13        or her official duties.14        (5) A judge, emergency management worker, emergency 15    medical services personnel, or utility worker:16            (i) performing his or her official duties;17            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 18        official duties; or19            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 20        or her official duties.21        (6) An officer or employee of the State of Illinois, a 22    unit of local government, or a school district, while 23    performing his or her official duties.24        (7) A transit employee performing his or her official 25    duties, or a transit passenger.26        (8) A taxi driver on duty.  SB1849- 18 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1        (9) A merchant who detains the person for an alleged 2    commission of retail theft under Section 16-26 of this 3    Code and the person without legal justification by any 4    means causes bodily harm to the merchant.5        (10) A person authorized to serve process under 6    Section 2-202 of the Code of Civil Procedure or a special 7    process server appointed by the circuit court while that 8    individual is in the performance of his or her duties as a 9    process server.10        (11) A nurse while in the performance of his or her 11    duties as a nurse. 12        (12) A merchant: (i) while performing his or her 13    duties, including, but not limited to, relaying directions 14    for healthcare or safety from his or her supervisor or 15    employer or relaying health or safety guidelines, 16    recommendations, regulations, or rules from a federal, 17    State, or local public health agency; and (ii) during a 18    disaster declared by the Governor, or a state of emergency 19    declared by the mayor of the municipality in which the 20    merchant is located, due to a public health emergency and 21    for a period of 6 months after such declaration. 22    (e) Offense based on use of a firearm. A person commits 23aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he or she 24knowingly does any of the following:25        (1) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 26    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury   SB1849- 19 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    to another person.2        (2) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 3    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 4    to a person he or she knows to be a peace officer, 5    community policing volunteer, person summoned by a police 6    officer, fireman, private security officer, correctional 7    institution employee, or emergency management worker:8            (i) performing his or her official duties;9            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 10        official duties; or11            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 12        or her official duties.13        (3) Discharges a firearm, other than a machine gun or 14    a firearm equipped with a silencer, and causes any injury 15    to a person he or she knows to be emergency medical 16    services personnel:17            (i) performing his or her official duties;18            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 19        official duties; or20            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 21        or her official duties.22        (4) Discharges a firearm and causes any injury to a 23    person he or she knows to be a teacher, a student in a 24    school, or a school employee, and the teacher, student, or 25    employee is upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a 26    school or in any part of a building used for school   SB1849- 20 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    purposes.2        (5) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 3    with a silencer, and causes any injury to another person.4        (6) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 5    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 6    she knows to be a peace officer, community policing 7    volunteer, person summoned by a police officer, fireman, 8    private security officer, correctional institution 9    employee or emergency management worker:10            (i) performing his or her official duties;11            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 12        official duties; or13            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 14        or her official duties.15        (7) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 16    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 17    she knows to be emergency medical services personnel:18            (i) performing his or her official duties;19            (ii) battered to prevent performance of his or her 20        official duties; or21            (iii) battered in retaliation for performing his 22        or her official duties.23        (8) Discharges a machine gun or a firearm equipped 24    with a silencer, and causes any injury to a person he or 25    she knows to be a teacher, or a student in a school, or a 26    school employee, and the teacher, student, or employee is   SB1849- 21 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    upon school grounds or grounds adjacent to a school or in 2    any part of a building used for school purposes. 3    (f) Offense based on use of a weapon or device. A person 4commits aggravated battery when, in committing a battery, he 5or she does any of the following:6        (1) Uses a deadly weapon other than by discharge of a 7    firearm, or uses an air rifle as defined in Section 8    24.8-0.1 of this Code.9        (2) Wears a hood, robe, or mask to conceal his or her 10    identity.11        (3) Knowingly and without lawful justification shines 12    or flashes a laser gunsight or other laser device attached 13    to a firearm, or used in concert with a firearm, so that 14    the laser beam strikes upon or against the person of 15    another.16        (4) Knowingly video or audio records the offense with 17    the intent to disseminate the recording. 18    (g) Offense based on certain conduct. A person commits 19aggravated battery when, other than by discharge of a firearm, 20he or she does any of the following:21        (1) Violates Section 401 of the Illinois Controlled 22    Substances Act by unlawfully delivering a controlled 23    substance to another and any user experiences great bodily 24    harm or permanent disability as a result of the injection, 25    inhalation, or ingestion of any amount of the controlled 26    substance.  SB1849- 22 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1        (2) Knowingly administers to an individual or causes 2    him or her to take, without his or her consent or by threat 3    or deception, and for other than medical purposes, any 4    intoxicating, poisonous, stupefying, narcotic, 5    anesthetic, or controlled substance, or gives to another 6    person any food containing any substance or object 7    intended to cause physical injury if eaten.8        (3) Knowingly causes or attempts to cause a 9    correctional institution employee or Department of Human 10    Services employee to come into contact with blood, seminal 11    fluid, urine, or feces by throwing, tossing, or expelling 12    the fluid or material, and the person is an inmate of a 13    penal institution or is a sexually dangerous person or 14    sexually violent person in the custody of the Department 15    of Human Services.16    (h) Sentence. Unless otherwise provided, aggravated 17battery is a Class 3 felony.18    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(4), 19(d)(4), or (g)(3) is a Class 2 felony.20    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(3) or 21(g)(1) is a Class 1 felony.22    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 23Class 1 felony when the aggravated battery was intentional and 24involved the infliction of torture, as defined in paragraph 25(10) of subsection (b-5) of Section 5-8-1 of the Unified Code 26of Corrections, as the infliction of or subjection to extreme   SB1849- 23 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1physical pain, motivated by an intent to increase or prolong 2the pain, suffering, or agony of the victim. 3    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(1) is a 4Class 2 felony when the person causes great bodily harm or 5permanent disability to an individual whom the person knows to 6be a member of a congregation engaged in prayer or other 7religious activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or other 8building, structure, or place used for religious worship. 9    Aggravated battery under subdivision (a)(5) is a Class 1 10felony if:11        (A) the person used or attempted to use a dangerous 12    instrument while committing the offense;13        (B) the person caused great bodily harm or permanent 14    disability or disfigurement to the other person while 15    committing the offense; or16        (C) the person has been previously convicted of a 17    violation of subdivision (a)(5) under the laws of this 18    State or laws similar to subdivision (a)(5) of any other 19    state. 20    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(1) is a 21Class X felony.22    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (a)(2) is a 23Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 24of imprisonment of a minimum of 6 years and a maximum of 45 25years.26    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(5) is a   SB1849- 24 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1Class X felony for which a person shall be sentenced to a term 2of imprisonment of a minimum of 12 years and a maximum of 45 3years.4    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(2), 5(e)(3), or (e)(4) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 6be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 15 years 7and a maximum of 60 years.8    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (e)(6), 9(e)(7), or (e)(8) is a Class X felony for which a person shall 10be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of a minimum of 20 years 11and a maximum of 60 years.12    Aggravated battery as defined in subdivision (b)(1) is a 13Class X felony, except that:14        (1) if the person committed the offense while 15    personally armed with a firearm, and while personally 16    displaying the firearm, up to 15 years may shall be added 17    to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court;18        (2) if, during the commission of the offense, the 19    person personally discharged a firearm, up to 20 years may 20    shall be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the 21    court;22        (3) if, during the commission of the offense, the 23    person personally discharged a firearm that proximately 24    caused great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 25    disfigurement, or death to another person, up to 25 years 26    may or up to a term of natural life shall be added to the   SB1849- 25 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    term of imprisonment imposed by the court.2    (i) Definitions. In this Section:3    "Building or other structure used to provide shelter" has 4the meaning ascribed to "shelter" in Section 1 of the Domestic 5Violence Shelters Act.6    "Domestic violence" has the meaning ascribed to it in 7Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.8    "Domestic violence shelter" means any building or other 9structure used to provide shelter or other services to victims 10or to the dependent children of victims of domestic violence 11pursuant to the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986 or the 12Domestic Violence Shelters Act, or any place within 500 feet 13of such a building or other structure in the case of a person 14who is going to or from such a building or other structure.15    "Firearm" has the meaning provided under Section 1.1 of 16the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, and does not 17include an air rifle as defined by Section 24.8-0.1 of this 18Code. 19    "Machine gun" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 2024-1 of this Code.21    "Merchant" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 2216-0.1 of this Code. 23    "Strangle" means intentionally impeding the normal 24breathing or circulation of the blood of an individual by 25applying pressure on the throat or neck of that individual or 26by blocking the nose or mouth of that individual.   SB1849- 26 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1(Source: P.A. 103-51, eff. 1-1-24.) 2    (720 ILCS 5/18-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 18-2)3    Sec. 18-2. Armed robbery. 4    (a) A person commits armed robbery when he or she violates 5Section 18-1; and 6        (1) he or she carries on or about his or her person or 7    is otherwise armed with a dangerous weapon other than a 8    firearm; or 9        (2) he or she carries on or about his or her person or 10    is otherwise armed with a firearm; or 11        (3) he or she, during the commission of the offense, 12    personally discharges a firearm; or 13        (4) he or she, during the commission of the offense, 14    personally discharges a firearm that proximately causes 15    great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 16    disfigurement, or death to another person.17    (b) Sentence.18    Armed robbery in violation of subsection (a)(1) is a Class 19X felony. A violation of subsection (a)(2) is a Class X felony 20for which up to 15 years may shall be added to the term of 21imprisonment imposed by the court, if the person committed the 22offense while personally armed with a firearm, and while 23personally displaying the firearm. A violation of subsection 24(a)(3) is a Class X felony for which up to 20 years may shall 25be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court. A   SB1849- 27 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1violation of subsection (a)(4) is a Class X felony for which up 2to 25 years may or up to a term of natural life shall be added 3to the term of imprisonment imposed by the court.4(Source: P.A. 91-404, eff. 1-1-00.) 5    (720 ILCS 5/18-4)6    Sec. 18-4. Aggravated vehicular hijacking. 7    (a) A person commits aggravated vehicular hijacking when 8he or she violates Section 18-3; and9        (1) the person from whose immediate presence the motor 10    vehicle is taken is a person with a physical disability or 11    a person 60 years of age or over; or12        (2) a person under 16 years of age is a passenger in 13    the motor vehicle at the time of the offense; or14        (3) he or she carries on or about his or her person, or 15    is otherwise armed with a dangerous weapon, other than a 16    firearm; or17        (4) he or she carries on or about his or her person or 18    is otherwise armed with a firearm; or19        (5) he or she, during the commission of the offense, 20    personally discharges a firearm; or21        (6) he or she, during the commission of the offense, 22    personally discharges a firearm that proximately causes 23    great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 24    disfigurement, or death to another person.25    (b) Sentence. Aggravated vehicular hijacking in violation   SB1849- 28 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1of subsections (a)(1) or (a)(2) is a Class X felony. A 2violation of subsection (a)(3) is a Class X felony for which a 3term of imprisonment of not less than 7 years shall be imposed. 4A violation of subsection (a)(4) is a Class X felony for which 5up to 15 years may shall be added to the term of imprisonment 6imposed by the court, if the person committed the offense 7while personally armed with a firearm, and while personally 8displaying the firearm. A violation of subsection (a)(5) is a 9Class X felony for which up to 20 years may shall be added to 10the term of imprisonment imposed by the court. A violation of 11subsection (a)(6) is a Class X felony for which up to 25 years 12may or up to a term of natural life shall be added to the term 13of imprisonment imposed by the court.14(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 15    (720 ILCS 5/19-6)  (was 720 ILCS 5/12-11)16    Sec. 19-6. Home Invasion. 17    (a) A person who is not a peace officer acting in the line 18of duty commits home invasion when without authority he or she 19knowingly enters the dwelling place of another when he or she 20knows or has reason to know that one or more persons is present 21or he or she knowingly enters the dwelling place of another and 22remains in the dwelling place until he or she knows or has 23reason to know that one or more persons is present or who 24falsely represents himself or herself, including but not 25limited to, falsely representing himself or herself to be a   SB1849- 29 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1representative of any unit of government or a construction, 2telecommunications, or utility company, for the purpose of 3gaining entry to the dwelling place of another when he or she 4knows or has reason to know that one or more persons are 5present and6        (1) While armed with a dangerous weapon, other than a 7    firearm, uses force or threatens the imminent use of force 8    upon any person or persons within the dwelling place 9    whether or not injury occurs, or10        (2) Intentionally causes any injury, except as 11    provided in subsection (a)(5), to any person or persons 12    within the dwelling place, or13        (3) While armed with a firearm uses force or threatens 14    the imminent use of force upon any person or persons 15    within the dwelling place whether or not injury occurs, or16        (4) Uses force or threatens the imminent use of force 17    upon any person or persons within the dwelling place 18    whether or not injury occurs and during the commission of 19    the offense personally discharges a firearm, or20        (5) Personally discharges a firearm that proximately 21    causes great bodily harm, permanent disability, permanent 22    disfigurement, or death to another person within the 23    dwelling place, or24        (6) Commits, against any person or persons within that 25    dwelling place, a violation of Section 11-1.20, 11-1.30, 26    11-1.40, 11-1.50, or 11-1.60 of this Code.  SB1849- 30 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    (b) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of home 2invasion that the accused who knowingly enters the dwelling 3place of another and remains in the dwelling place until he or 4she knows or has reason to know that one or more persons is 5present either immediately leaves the premises or surrenders 6to the person or persons lawfully present therein without 7either attempting to cause or causing serious bodily injury to 8any person present therein.9    (c) Sentence. Home invasion in violation of subsection 10(a)(1), (a)(2) or (a)(6) is a Class X felony. A violation of 11subsection (a)(3) is a Class X felony for which up to 15 years 12may shall be added to the term of imprisonment imposed by the 13court, if the person committed the offense while personally 14armed with a firearm, and while personally displaying the 15firearm. A violation of subsection (a)(4) is a Class X felony 16for which up to 20 years may shall be added to the term of 17imprisonment imposed by the court. A violation of subsection 18(a)(5) is a Class X felony for which up to 25 years may or up 19to a term of natural life shall be added to the term of 20imprisonment imposed by the court.21    (d) For purposes of this Section, "dwelling place of 22another" includes a dwelling place where the defendant 23maintains a tenancy interest but from which the defendant has 24been barred by a divorce decree, judgment of dissolution of 25marriage, order of protection, or other court order.26(Source: P.A. 96-1113, eff. 1-1-11; 96-1551, eff. 7-1-11;   SB1849- 31 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b197-1108, eff. 1-1-13; 97-1150, eff. 1-25-13.) 2    Section 10. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 3changing Section 5-8-1 as follows: 4    (730 ILCS 5/5-8-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-8-1)5    Sec. 5-8-1. Natural life imprisonment; enhancements for 6use of a firearm; mandatory supervised release terms. 7    (a) Except as otherwise provided in the statute defining 8the offense or in Article 4.5 of Chapter V, a sentence of 9imprisonment for a felony shall be a determinate sentence set 10by the court under this Section, subject to Section 5-4.5-115 11of this Code, according to the following limitations:12        (1) for first degree murder,13            (a) (blank),14            (b) if a trier of fact finds beyond a reasonable 15        doubt that the murder was accompanied by exceptionally 16        brutal or heinous behavior indicative of wanton 17        cruelty or, except as set forth in subsection 18        (a)(1)(c) of this Section, that any of the aggravating 19        factors listed in subparagraph (b-5) are present, the 20        court may sentence the defendant, subject to Section 21        5-4.5-105, to a term of natural life imprisonment, or22            (b-5) a A defendant who at the time of the 23        commission of the offense has attained the age of 18 or 24        more and who has been found guilty of first degree   SB1849- 32 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1        murder may be sentenced to a term of natural life 2        imprisonment if: 3                (1) the murdered individual was an inmate at 4            an institution or facility of the Department of 5            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 6            agency and was killed on the grounds thereof, or 7            the murdered individual was otherwise present in 8            such institution or facility with the knowledge 9            and approval of the chief administrative officer 10            thereof; 11                (2) the murdered individual was killed as a 12            result of the hijacking of an airplane, train, 13            ship, bus, or other public conveyance; 14                (3) the defendant committed the murder 15            pursuant to a contract, agreement, or 16            understanding by which he or she was to receive 17            money or anything of value in return for 18            committing the murder or procured another to 19            commit the murder for money or anything of value; 20                (4) the murdered individual was killed in the 21            course of another felony if: 22                    (A) the murdered individual: 23                        (i) was actually killed by the 24                    defendant, or 25                        (ii) received physical injuries 26                    personally inflicted by the defendant   SB1849- 33 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1                    substantially contemporaneously with 2                    physical injuries caused by one or more 3                    persons for whose conduct the defendant is 4                    legally accountable under Section 5-2 of 5                    this Code, and the physical injuries 6                    inflicted by either the defendant or the 7                    other person or persons for whose conduct 8                    he is legally accountable caused the death 9                    of the murdered individual; and (B) in 10                    performing the acts which caused the death 11                    of the murdered individual or which 12                    resulted in physical injuries personally 13                    inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 14                    individual under the circumstances of 15                    subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this 16                    clause (4), the defendant acted with the 17                    intent to kill the murdered individual or 18                    with the knowledge that his or her acts 19                    created a strong probability of death or 20                    great bodily harm to the murdered 21                    individual or another; and 22                    (B) in performing the acts which caused 23                the death of the murdered individual or which 24                resulted in physical injuries personally 25                inflicted by the defendant on the murdered 26                individual under the circumstances of   SB1849- 34 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1                subdivision (ii) of clause (A) of this clause 2                (4), the defendant acted with the intent to 3                kill the murdered individual or with the 4                knowledge that his or her acts created a 5                strong probability of death or great bodily 6                harm to the murdered individual or another; 7                and 8                    (C) the other felony was an inherently 9                violent crime or the attempt to commit an 10                inherently violent crime. In this clause (C), 11                "inherently violent crime" includes, but is 12                not limited to, armed robbery, robbery, 13                predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 14                aggravated criminal sexual assault, aggravated 15                kidnapping, aggravated vehicular hijacking, 16                aggravated arson, aggravated stalking, 17                residential burglary, and home invasion; 18                (5) the defendant committed the murder with 19            intent to prevent the murdered individual from 20            testifying or participating in any criminal 21            investigation or prosecution or giving material 22            assistance to the State in any investigation or 23            prosecution, either against the defendant or 24            another; or the defendant committed the murder 25            because the murdered individual was a witness in 26            any prosecution or gave material assistance to the   SB1849- 35 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1            State in any investigation or prosecution, either 2            against the defendant or another; for purposes of 3            this clause (5), "participating in any criminal 4            investigation or prosecution" is intended to 5            include those appearing in the proceedings in any 6            capacity such as trial judges, prosecutors, 7            defense attorneys, investigators, witnesses, or 8            jurors; 9                (6) the defendant, while committing an offense 10            punishable under Section 401, 401.1, 401.2, 405, 11            405.2, 407, or 407.1 or subsection (b) of Section 12            404 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, or 13            while engaged in a conspiracy or solicitation to 14            commit such offense, intentionally killed an 15            individual or counseled, commanded, induced, 16            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the 17            murdered individual; 18                (7) the defendant was incarcerated in an 19            institution or facility of the Department of 20            Corrections at the time of the murder, and while 21            committing an offense punishable as a felony under 22            Illinois law, or while engaged in a conspiracy or 23            solicitation to commit such offense, intentionally 24            killed an individual or counseled, commanded, 25            induced, procured, or caused the intentional 26            killing of the murdered individual;   SB1849- 36 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1                (8) the murder was committed in a cold, 2            calculated and premeditated manner pursuant to a 3            preconceived plan, scheme, or design to take a 4            human life by unlawful means, and the conduct of 5            the defendant created a reasonable expectation 6            that the death of a human being would result 7            therefrom; 8                (9) the defendant was a principal 9            administrator, organizer, or leader of a 10            calculated criminal drug conspiracy consisting of 11            a hierarchical position of authority superior to 12            that of all other members of the conspiracy, and 13            the defendant counseled, commanded, induced, 14            procured, or caused the intentional killing of the 15            murdered person; 16                (10) the murder was intentional and involved 17            the infliction of torture. For the purpose of this 18            clause (10), torture means the infliction of or 19            subjection to extreme physical pain, motivated by 20            an intent to increase or prolong the pain, 21            suffering, or agony of the victim; 22                (11) the murder was committed as a result of 23            the intentional discharge of a firearm by the 24            defendant from a motor vehicle and the victim was 25            not present within the motor vehicle; 26                (12) the murdered individual was a person with   SB1849- 37 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1            a disability and the defendant knew or should have 2            known that the murdered individual was a person 3            with a disability. For purposes of this clause 4            (12), "person with a disability" means a person 5            who suffers from a permanent physical or mental 6            impairment resulting from disease, an injury, a 7            functional disorder, or a congenital condition 8            that renders the person incapable of adequately 9            providing for his or her own health or personal 10            care; 11                (13) the murdered individual was subject to an 12            order of protection and the murder was committed 13            by a person against whom the same order of 14            protection was issued under the Illinois Domestic 15            Violence Act of 1986; 16                (14) the murdered individual was known by the 17            defendant to be a teacher or other person employed 18            in any school and the teacher or other employee is 19            upon the grounds of a school or grounds adjacent 20            to a school, or is in any part of a building used 21            for school purposes; 22                (15) the murder was committed by the defendant 23            in connection with or as a result of the offense of 24            terrorism as defined in Section 29D-14.9 of this 25            Code; 26                (16) the murdered individual was a member of a   SB1849- 38 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1            congregation engaged in prayer or other religious 2            activities at a church, synagogue, mosque, or 3            other building, structure, or place used for 4            religious worship; or 5                (17)(i) the murdered individual was a 6            physician, physician assistant, psychologist, 7            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse; 8                (ii) the defendant knew or should have known 9            that the murdered individual was a physician, 10            physician assistant, psychologist, nurse, or 11            advanced practice registered nurse; and 12                (iii) the murdered individual was killed in 13            the course of acting in his or her capacity as a 14            physician, physician assistant, psychologist, 15            nurse, or advanced practice registered nurse, or 16            to prevent him or her from acting in that 17            capacity, or in retaliation for his or her acting 18            in that capacity. 19            (c) the court shall sentence the defendant to a 20        term of natural life imprisonment if the defendant, at 21        the time of the commission of the murder, had attained 22        the age of 18, and: 23                (i) has previously been convicted of first 24            degree murder under any state or federal law, or25                (ii) is found guilty of murdering more than 26            one victim, or  SB1849- 39 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1                (iii) is found guilty of murdering a peace 2            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker 3            when the peace officer, fireman, or emergency 4            management worker was killed in the course of 5            performing his official duties, or to prevent the 6            peace officer or fireman from performing his 7            official duties, or in retaliation for the peace 8            officer, fireman, or emergency management worker 9            from performing his official duties, and the 10            defendant knew or should have known that the 11            murdered individual was a peace officer, fireman, 12            or emergency management worker, or13                (iv) is found guilty of murdering an employee 14            of an institution or facility of the Department of 15            Corrections, or any similar local correctional 16            agency, when the employee was killed in the course 17            of performing his official duties, or to prevent 18            the employee from performing his official duties, 19            or in retaliation for the employee performing his 20            official duties, or21                (v) is found guilty of murdering an emergency 22            medical technician - ambulance, emergency medical 23            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 24            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 25            medical assistance or first aid person while 26            employed by a municipality or other governmental   SB1849- 40 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1            unit when the person was killed in the course of 2            performing official duties or to prevent the 3            person from performing official duties or in 4            retaliation for performing official duties and the 5            defendant knew or should have known that the 6            murdered individual was an emergency medical 7            technician - ambulance, emergency medical 8            technician - intermediate, emergency medical 9            technician - paramedic, ambulance driver, or other 10            medical assistant or first aid personnel, or11                (vi) (blank), or12                (vii) is found guilty of first degree murder 13            and the murder was committed by reason of any 14            person's activity as a community policing 15            volunteer or to prevent any person from engaging 16            in activity as a community policing volunteer. For 17            the purpose of this Section, "community policing 18            volunteer" has the meaning ascribed to it in 19            Section 2-3.5 of the Criminal Code of 2012.20            For purposes of clause (v), "emergency medical 21        technician - ambulance", "emergency medical technician -22         intermediate", and "emergency medical technician - 23        paramedic", have the meanings ascribed to them in the 24        Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act.25            (d)(i) if the person committed the offense while 26            personally armed with a firearm, and while   SB1849- 41 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1            personally displaying the firearm, up to 15 years 2            may shall be added to the term of imprisonment 3            imposed by the court;4            (ii) if, during the commission of the offense, the 5        person personally discharged a firearm, up to 20 years 6        may shall be added to the term of imprisonment imposed 7        by the court;8            (iii) if, during the commission of the offense, 9        the person personally discharged a firearm that 10        proximately caused great bodily harm, permanent 11        disability, permanent disfigurement, or death to 12        another person, up to 25 years may or up to a term of 13        natural life shall be added to the term of 14        imprisonment imposed by the court.15        (2) (blank);16        (2.5) for a person who has attained the age of 18 years 17    at the time of the commission of the offense and who is 18    convicted under the circumstances described in subdivision 19    (b)(1)(B) of Section 11-1.20 or paragraph (3) of 20    subsection (b) of Section 12-13, subdivision (d)(2) of 21    Section 11-1.30 or paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of 22    Section 12-14, subdivision (b)(1.2) of Section 11-1.40 or 23    paragraph (1.2) of subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1, 24    subdivision (b)(2) of Section 11-1.40 or paragraph (2) of 25    subsection (b) of Section 12-14.1 of the Criminal Code of 26    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, the sentence shall be a   SB1849- 42 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    term of natural life imprisonment.2    (b) (Blank).3    (c) (Blank).4    (d) Subject to earlier termination under Section 3-3-8, 5the parole or mandatory supervised release term shall be 6written as part of the sentencing order and shall be as 7follows:8        (1) for first degree murder or for the offenses of 9    predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated 10    criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual assault if 11    committed on or before December 12, 2005, 3 years;12        (1.5) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this 13    subsection (d), for a Class X felony except for the 14    offenses of predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 15    aggravated criminal sexual assault, and criminal sexual 16    assault if committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the 17    effective date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the 18    offense of aggravated child pornography under Section 19    11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 with sentencing under 20    subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code 21    of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, if committed on or 22    after January 1, 2009, and except for the offense of 23    obscene depiction of a purported child with sentencing 24    under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal 25    Code of 2012, 18 months; 26        (2) except as provided in paragraph (7) of this   SB1849- 43 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    subsection (d), for a Class 1 felony or a Class 2 felony 2    except for the offense of criminal sexual assault if 3    committed on or after December 13, 2005 (the effective 4    date of Public Act 94-715) and except for the offenses of 5    manufacture and dissemination of child pornography under 6    clauses (a)(1) and (a)(2) of Section 11-20.1 of the 7    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, if 8    committed on or after January 1, 2009, and except for the 9    offense of obscene depiction of a purported child under 10    paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 11-20.4 of the 11    Criminal Code of 2012, 12 months;12        (3) except as provided in paragraph (4), (6), or (7) 13    of this subsection (d), for a Class 3 felony or a Class 4 14    felony, 6 months; no later than 45 days after the onset of 15    the term of mandatory supervised release, the Prisoner 16    Review Board shall conduct a discretionary discharge 17    review pursuant to the provisions of Section 3-3-8, which 18    shall include the results of a standardized risk and needs 19    assessment tool administered by the Department of 20    Corrections; the changes to this paragraph (3) made by 21    Public Act 102-1104 this amendatory Act of the 102nd 22    General Assembly apply to all individuals released on 23    mandatory supervised release on or after December 6, 2022 24    (the effective date of Public Act 102-1104) this 25    amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, including 26    those individuals whose sentences were imposed prior to   SB1849- 44 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    December 6, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 2    102-1104) this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 3    Assembly;4        (4) for defendants who commit the offense of predatory 5    criminal sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal 6    sexual assault, or criminal sexual assault, on or after 7    December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 8    94-715), or who commit the offense of aggravated child 9    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 10    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 11    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 12    manufacture of child pornography, or dissemination of 13    child pornography after January 1, 2009, or who commit the 14    offense of obscene depiction of a purported child under 15    paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 11-20.4 of the 16    Criminal Code of 2012 or who commit the offense of obscene 17    depiction of a purported child with sentencing under 18    subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the Criminal Code of 19    2012, the term of mandatory supervised release shall range 20    from a minimum of 3 years to a maximum of the natural life 21    of the defendant;22        (5) if the victim is under 18 years of age, for a 23    second or subsequent offense of aggravated criminal sexual 24    abuse or felony criminal sexual abuse, 4 years, at least 25    the first 2 years of which the defendant shall serve in an 26    electronic monitoring or home detention program under   SB1849- 45 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    Article 8A of Chapter V of this Code;2        (6) for a felony domestic battery, aggravated domestic 3    battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, and a felony 4    violation of an order of protection, 4 years; 5        (7) for any felony described in paragraph (a)(2)(ii), 6    (a)(2)(iii), (a)(2)(iv), (a)(2)(vi), (a)(2.1), (a)(2.3), 7    (a)(2.4), (a)(2.5), or (a)(2.6) of Article 5, Section 8    3-6-3 of the Unified Code of Corrections requiring an 9    inmate to serve a minimum of 85% of their court-imposed 10    sentence, except for the offenses of predatory criminal 11    sexual assault of a child, aggravated criminal sexual 12    assault, and criminal sexual assault if committed on or 13    after December 13, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 14    94-715) and except for the offense of aggravated child 15    pornography under Section 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-20.1 16    with sentencing under subsection (c-5) of Section 11-20.1 17    of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 18    if committed on or after January 1, 2009, and except for 19    the offense of obscene depiction of a purported child with 20    sentencing under subsection (d) of Section 11-20.4 of the 21    Criminal Code of 2012, and except as provided in paragraph 22    (4) or paragraph (6) of this subsection (d), the term of 23    mandatory supervised release shall be as follows:24            (A) Class X felony, 3 years;25            (B) Class 1 or Class 2 felonies, 2 years;26            (C) Class 3 or Class 4 felonies, 1 year.   SB1849- 46 -LRB104 10141 RLC 20213 b1    (e) (Blank).2    (f) (Blank).3    (g) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Act and 4of Public Act 101-652: (i) the provisions of paragraph (3) of 5subsection (d) are effective on July 1, 2022 and shall apply to 6all individuals convicted on or after the effective date of 7paragraph (3) of subsection (d); and (ii) the provisions of 8paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of subsection (d) are effective on 9July 1, 2021 and shall apply to all individuals convicted on or 10after the effective date of paragraphs (1.5) and (2) of 11subsection (d).12(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21; 13102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-1104, eff. 12-6-22; 103-51, eff. 141-1-24; 103-825, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-24-24.)